Utah statutes.
62A-3-315.   Protective services voluntary unless court ordered.

(1)  Vulnerable adults who receive protective services under this part shall do so knowingly or voluntarily or upon district court order.

(2)  Protective services may be provided without a court order for a vulnerable adult who does not lack capacity to consent and who requests or knowingly or voluntarily consents to those services.  Protective services may also be provided for a vulnerable adult whose guardian or conservator with authority to consent does consent to those services.  When short-term, limited protective services are provided, the division and the recipient, or the recipient's guardian or conservator, shall execute a written agreement setting forth the purposes and limitations of the services to be provided.   If consent is subsequently withdrawn by the recipient, the recipient's guardian or conservator, or the court, services, including any investigation, shall cease.

(3)  The court may order  protective services to be provided to a vulnerable adult who does not consent or who lacks capacity to consent to services in accordance with this part.

